Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.2721

Public transportation systems—Authority of municipalities to acquire, operate, etc.—Indebtedness—Bond issues.

(1) In addition to any other authority now provided by law, and subject only to constitutional limitations, the governing body of any municipality shall be authorized to acquire, construct, operate, and maintain a public transportation system and additions and betterments thereto, and to issue general obligation bonds for public mass transportation capital purposes including but not limited to replacement of equipment: PROVIDED, That the general indebtedness incurred under this section when considered together with all the other outstanding general indebtedness of the municipality shall not exceed the amounts of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW and chapter 35.58 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without and with the assent of the voters. Such bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

Any municipality is authorized to pledge for the payment or security of the principal of and interest on any bonds issued for authorized public transportation purposes all or any portion of any taxes authorized to be levied by the issuer, including, but not limited to, the local sales and use tax authorized pursuant to RCW 82.14.045, as now or hereafter amended. No motor vehicle excise taxes under *RCW 35.58.273 may be pledged for bonds.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1990 c 42 s 315; 1983 c 167 s 46; 1979 ex.s. c 175 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.58.273 was repealed by 2002 c 6 s 2.

Purpose—Effective dates—Application—Implementation—1990 c 42: See notes following RCW 46.68.090.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.

Financing of public transportation systems in municipalities: Chapter 35.95 RCW and RCW 82.14.045.